Utah statutes.
16-6a-1606.   Financial statements.

By no later than 15 days after the day on which the nonprofit corporation receives a written request of any member, a nonprofit corporation shall mail to the member the following that show in reasonable detail the assets and liabilities and results of the operations of the nonprofit corporation:

(1) the nonprofit corporation's most recent annual financial statements, if any; and

(2) the nonprofit corporation's most recently published financial statements, if any.

